Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4934.01
Changes to act; applicability.

Section 77-4927.01 and the changes made to sections 77-4901 and 77-4925 by Laws 1996, LB 1368, apply to any agreement entered into under the Quality Jobs Act after July 19, 1996.

The changes made to sections 77-4928 and 77-4929 by Laws 1998, LB 939, apply to all applications filed on or after January 1, 1998. For all applications filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Quality Jobs Act as they existed immediately prior to such date apply.

Laws 1996, LB 1368, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 939, § 3.